tests/и_subst.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "и <subst>":
    лайӑх<adj>+и<subst><nom> :  лайӑххи 
    пысӑк<adj>+и<subst><nom> :  пысӑкки 
    пӗчӗк<adj>+и<subst><nom> :  пӗчӗкки 
    аван<adj>+и<subst><nom> :  аванни 
    тутлӑ<adj>+и<subst><nom> :  тутли 
    ҫурӑ<adj>+и<subst><nom> :  ҫурри 
    хура<adj>+и<subst><nom> :  хури 
    хитре<adj>+и<subst><nom> :  хитри 
    лайӑх<adj>+и<subst><dat> :  лайӑххин
    лайӑх<adj>+и<subst><ins> :  лайӑххипе
    лайӑх<adj>+и<subst><pl><nom> :  лайӑххисем
    лайӑх<adj>+и<subst><pl><gen> :  лайӑххисен
    лайӑх<adj>+ах<mod> :  лайӑхах
    лайӑх<adj><comp> :  лайӑхрах
    аван<adj>+ах<mod> :  аванах
    аван<adj><comp> :  авантарах
